Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Chapter 12 Flexible Credit Act
45-12-126. Allocation of certain fees.

The department may, in the department's sole discretion, allocate a portion of the total amount collected in fees pursuant to §§45-12-106 and45-12-109 to the Tennessee financial literacy commission, created by §49-6-1702.

Acts 2014, ch. 969, § 1.

45-12-125. Disclosure and sharing of information and material provided to multi-state automated licensing system.